Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.100

Washington scholars' program—Purpose.

Each year high schools in the state of Washington graduate a significant number of students who have distinguished themselves through outstanding academic achievement. The purpose of RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 is to establish a consistent and uniform program which will recognize and honor the accomplishments of these students; encourage and facilitate privately funded scholarship awards among them; stimulate the recruitment of outstanding students to Washington public and private colleges and universities; and allow educational and legislative leaders, as well as the governor, to reaffirm the importance of educational excellence to the future of this state.

[ 1990 c 33 s 499; 1985 c 341 s 14; 1981 c 54 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.820.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 54: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 54 s 10.]

Grants for undergraduate coursework for recipients of the Washington scholars award: RCW 28B.15.543.

State honors awards program: RCW 28A.600.050 through 28A.600.080.